sv: Bindans tjocklek: Maxi; Vanligt; Super; Tjockt; Tunt; Ultratunn; Övrigt
th: ความหนาของผ้าอนามัย: แม็กซี่; ธรรมดา; ซูเปอร์; หนา; ผมบาง; บางพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
el: Πάχος σερβιέτας: Μάξι φόρεμα; Κανονική; Μέγιστη; Παχύ; Λεπτό; Εξαιρετικά λεπτό; Άλλο
es: Grosor de la almohadilla: Maxi; Regular; Súper; Grueso; Fino; Ultradelgado; Otros
cs: Tloušťka vložky: Maxi; Běžná; Super; Silnější; Tenčí; Ultra tenké; Jiné
ko: 패드 두께: 맥시; 레귤러; 슈퍼; 띡; 얇은; 울트라 씬; 기타
it: Spessore dell'assorbente: Maxi; Regular; Super; Spesso; Sottile; Ultra sottile; Altro
pt-BR: Espessura do absorvente: Maxi; Regular; Super; Encorpado; Ralo; Ultrafino; Outro
fi: Siteen paksuus: Maxi; Tavallinen; Super; Paksu; Ohut; Ultraohut; Muu
sk-SK: Hrúbka vložky: Maxi; Bežný; Super; Hustý; Tenký; Ultra tenká; Iné
ru: Толщина прокладки: Макси; Обычные; Супер; Толстый; Тонкий; Ультратонкие; Другой
ja: パッド厚さ: マキシ; レギュラー; スーパー; 厚みのある; 薄い; 極薄; その他
vi: Độ dày băng vệ sinh: Dáng dài; Thường; Siêu; Dày; Mỏng; Siêu mỏng; Khác
pt-PT: Espessura do absorvente: Maxi; Normal; Super; Espesso; Fino; Ultrafino; Outro
ro-RO: Grosimea absorbantului: Maxi; Normală; Super; Densă; Subțire; Ultra subțire; Altele
hr-HR: Debljina uloška: Maksi; Regularni; Super; Gusta; Tanka; Ultra tanki; Ostalo
da: Bindtykkelse: Maxi; Almindelig; Super; Tyk; Tyndt; Ultratyndt; Andet
en: Pad thickness: Maxi; Regular; Super; Thick; Thin; Ultra thin; Other
zh-CN: 护垫厚度: 及踝; 常规; 超大; 粗; 薄; 超薄型; 其他
pl: Grubość podpaski: Maks.; Zwyczajna; Super; Gruby; Cienki; Ultracienka; Inne
nl: Maandverbanddikte: Maxi; Normaal; Super; Dik; Dun; Ultradun; Andere
zh-TW: 護墊厚度: 長裙; 一般; 良好的; 厚; 薄; 超薄; 其他
lt-LT: Įkloto storis: Maxi; Įprasti; Super; Klampus; Plonas; Ultraplonas; Kita
fr: Épaisseur de la protection: Longue; Normal; Super; Épais; Fin; Ultra mince; Autre
bg-BG: Дебелина на превръзката: Макси; Обикновена; Супер; Дебела; Тънка; Ултра тънък; Други
sl-SI: Debelina vložka: Dolga; Običajna; Izjemno močna; Debele; Tanke; Ultra tanko; Drugo
hu: Betét vastagsága: Maxi; Normál; Szuper; Vastag; Vékony; Ultra vékony; Egyéb
de: Bindendicke: Maxi; Normal; Super; Dick; Dünn; Ultradünn; Sonstiges
tr: Ped kalınlığı: Maksi; Normal; Süper; Kalın; İnce; Ultra ince; Diğer
nb: Bindtykkelse: Maxi; Vanlig; Super; Tykk; Tynn; Ultratynn; Annet